Idaho, session 2025, H0478.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 17, Title 22, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 22-1708, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
22-1708. RETAIL SALE OF INDUSTRIAL HEMP PRODUCTS. (1) Food or drink
products that are intended for human consumption and that contain cannabi-
noids shall not be sold within the state of Idaho.
(2) Any retail store within the state of Idaho that sells hemp prod-
ucts shall obtain a license from the Idaho department of agriculture. Li-
censes shall be valid for one (1) year. The annual license fee shall be six
hundred dollars ($600). The department may issue a single license that cov-
ers multiple retail store locations owned, operated, or controlled by a per-
son. Each additional store covered by a single license shall be subject to a
twenty-five dollar ($25.00) fee.
(3) The department may conduct inspections to ensure compliance is
maintained with applicable state and federal laws and regulations and the
state hemp plan. During an inspection, the department may randomly select
reasonably sized samples from the retail store for future off-site test-
ing. The license holder may request a retest of the original sample within
five (5) days from the date the license holder receives the result of the
first test. The licensee shall bear the full cost of laboratory testing and
retesting.
(4) Any person who violates or fails to comply with the provisions of
this section or any rules promulgated pursuant to this section may be as-
sessed a civil penalty by the department or its duly authorized agent of not
more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each offense and shall be liable
for reasonable attorney's fees. Assessment of a civil penalty may be made
in conjunction with any other department administrative action. No civil
penalty may be assessed unless the person charged was given notice and op-
portunity for a hearing pursuant to the Idaho administrative procedure act,
chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code.
(5) The department may promulgate rules, subject to legislative
approval, through a negotiated rulemaking process to effectuate the provi-
sions of this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall be in full force and effect on and after Jan-
uary 1, 2027.